lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX C Y 106
SFX C   ce          c          ice
SFX C   e           í          [^i]ce
SFX C   e           í          [èijlø]e
SFX C   e           0          ¹e
SFX C   e           ím         [cèijlø¹]e
SFX C   e           ích        [cèijlø¹]e
SFX C   0           mi         [cèijl¹]e
SFX C   e           mi         øe
SFX C   ì           í          ì
SFX C   ì           ím         ì
SFX C   ì           ích        ì
SFX C   0           mi         ì
SFX C   0           m          í
SFX C   o           a          o
SFX C   o           u          o
SFX C   o           em         o
SFX C   cký         ènost      cký
SFX C   cký         ènosti     cký
SFX C   cký         èností     cký
SFX C   cký         ènostem    cký
SFX C   cký         ènostech   cký
SFX C   cký         ènostmi    cký
SFX C   ci          ¾en        oci
SFX C   ci          ¾ena       oci
SFX C   ci          ¾eno       oci
SFX C   ci          ¾eni       oci
SFX C   ci          ¾eny       oci
SFX C   ci          ¾enu       oci
SFX C   tit         cen        [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         cena       [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         ceno       [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         ceni       [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         ceny       [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         cenu       [^s]tit
SFX C   dit         zen        [^z¾]dit
SFX C   dit         zena       [^z¾]dit
SFX C   dit         zeno       [^z¾]dit
SFX C   dit         zeni       [^z¾]dit
SFX C   dit         zeny       [^z¾]dit
SFX C   dit         zenu       [^z¾]dit
SFX C   sit         ¹en        sit
SFX C   sit         ¹ena       sit
SFX C   sit         ¹eno       sit
SFX C   sit         ¹eni       sit
SFX C   sit         ¹eny       sit
SFX C   sit         ¹enu       sit
SFX C   zit         ¾en        zit
SFX C   zit         ¾ena       zit
SFX C   zit         ¾eno       zit
SFX C   zit         ¾eni       zit
SFX C   zit         ¾eny       zit
SFX C   zit         ¾enu       zit
SFX C   slit        ¹len       slit
SFX C   slit        ¹lena      slit
SFX C   slit        ¹leno      slit
SFX C   slit        ¹leni      slit
SFX C   slit        ¹leny      slit
SFX C   slit        ¹lenu      slit
SFX C   stit        ¹tìn       stit
SFX C   stit        ¹tìna      stit
SFX C   stit        ¹tìno      stit
SFX C   stit        ¹tìni      stit
SFX C   stit        ¹tìny      stit
SFX C   stit        ¹tìnu      stit
SFX C   zdit        ¾dìn       zdit
SFX C   zdit        ¾dìna      zdit
SFX C   zdit        ¾dìno      zdit
SFX C   zdit        ¾dìni      zdit
SFX C   zdit        ¾dìny      zdit
SFX C   zdit        ¾dìnu      zdit
SFX C   áhnout      a¾en       áhnout
SFX C   áhnout      a¾ena      áhnout
SFX C   áhnout      a¾eno      áhnout
SFX C   áhnout      a¾eni      áhnout
SFX C   áhnout      a¾eny      áhnout
SFX C   áhnout      a¾enu      áhnout
SFX C   chnout      ¹en        chnout
SFX C   chnout      ¹ena       chnout
SFX C   chnout      ¹eno       chnout
SFX C   chnout      ¹eni       chnout
SFX C   chnout      ¹eny       chnout
SFX C   chnout      ¹enu       chnout
SFX C   hnout       ¾en        [^ác]hnout
SFX C   hnout       ¾ena       [^ác]hnout
SFX C   hnout       ¾eno       [^ác]hnout
SFX C   hnout       ¾eni       [^ác]hnout
SFX C   hnout       ¾eny       [^ác]hnout
SFX C   hnout       ¾enu       [^ác]hnout
SFX C   éknout      eèen       éknout
SFX C   éknout      eèena      éknout
SFX C   éknout      eèeno      éknout
SFX C   éknout      eèeni      éknout
SFX C   éknout      eèeny      éknout
SFX C   éknout      eèenu      éknout
SFX C   sknout      ¹tìn       sknout
SFX C   sknout      ¹tìna      sknout
SFX C   sknout      ¹tìno      sknout
SFX C   sknout      ¹tìni      sknout
SFX C   sknout      ¹tìny      sknout
SFX C   sknout      ¹tìnu      sknout
SFX C   knout       èen        [^és]knout
SFX C   knout       èena       [^és]knout
SFX C   knout       èeno       [^és]knout
SFX C   knout       èeni       [^és]knout
SFX C   knout       èeny       [^és]knout
SFX C   knout       èenu       [^és]knout

SFX M Y 52
SFX M   o           a          [^c]o
SFX M   o           u          [^c]o
SFX M   o           e          dlo
SFX M   o           em         [^c]o
SFX M   o           ùm         [^ciy]o
SFX M   o           ech        [^cghkeiy]o
SFX M   o           ách        [ghk]o
SFX M   ko          cích       isko
SFX M   o           y          [^¾¹èøcjiy]o
SFX M   o           í          [aeiouy]o
SFX M   o           ím         [eiy]o
SFX M   o           ích        [eiy]o
SFX M   o           i          [¾¹èøjeiy]o
SFX M   a           ùm         a
SFX M   a           ách        [ghk]a
SFX M   a           ech        [^ghkei]a
SFX M   a           y          [^¾¹èøcji]a
SFX M   on          a          on
SFX M   on          u          on
SFX M   on          em         on
SFX M   on          í          on
SFX M   on          ím         on
SFX M   on          ích        on
SFX M   on          i          on
SFX M   um          a          um
SFX M   um          u          um
SFX M   um          em         um
SFX M   um          í          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]um
SFX M   um          ím         [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]um
SFX M   um          ùm         [^aeiouyáéíóúùýì]um
SFX M   um          ích        [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]um
SFX M   um          ech        [^aeiouyáéíóúùýìk]um
SFX M   um          ách        kum
SFX M   um          i          [^hkrdtnbflmbsvz]um
SFX M   um          y          [hkrdtnbflmbsvz]um
SFX M   o           a          [^srn]co
SFX M   co          ka         [srn]co
SFX M   co          ku         [srn]co
SFX M   co          kem        [srn]co
SFX M   co          kùm        [srn]co
SFX M   co          ky         [srn]co
SFX M   o           ích        [srn]co
SFX M   e           i          e
SFX M   0           m          [eì]
SFX M   e           í          e
SFX M   e           ím         e
SFX M   e           ích        e
SFX M   ì           i          ì
SFX M   tì          »          tì
SFX M   ì           í          mì
SFX M   ì           ím         ì
SFX M   ì           ích        ì
