lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
absolutorium/M
áčko/MQ
adverbium/MQ
agnosticistický/YCRN
aktinium/MQ
aktualistický/YCR
albedo/MQ
alicyklický/YCR
alopatický/YCRN
aluminium/MQ
anabolikum/MQ
anaforický/YCRN
anarchosyndikalistický/YCR
Ankvice/C
anthelmintikum/MQ
antibiotikum/MQ
antiesencialistický/YCR
antihistaminikum/MQ
antimykotikum/MQ
antipatetický/YCR
antiseptikum/MQ
antitetický/YCRN
antroponymum/MQ
apolitický/YCR
arboretum/MQ
Arnoltice/C
asférický/YCRN
Aąsko/C
átrium/MQ
austroslavistický/YCR
autíčko/MQ
automatický/YCRN
avizo/MQ
bahniątě/M
balamutit/ACN
batolátko/MQ
behavioralistický/YCR
Běluąice/C
beneąovsko/MQ
Bezdědice/C
bídácký/YCRN
bidélko/MQ
bioenergetický/YCRN
biopařeniątě/M
Blahutovice/C
blejno/MQ
Bodamsko/C
Bohuňovice/C
bolero/MQ
Boletice/C
borůvčí/C
Braniborsko/C
bratrstvo/MQ
Bratřice/C
bronchopneumonický/YCR
Břeclavsko/C
břevno/MQ
budit/ACN
budoucno/MQ
byrokratický/YCRN
capriccio/MQ
centristický/YCRN
cesium/MQ
crescendo/MQ
cukrovanický/YCRN
čadit/ACN
Čejkovice/C
čelo/MQR
Černíkovice/C
českoněmecký/YCRN
čihadlo/MQ
Čimelice/C
čmeláčisko/MQ
Dačicko/C
Dasnice/C
decrescendo/MQ
děkabristický/YCRN
dělostřelectvo/MQ
Děpoltice/C
Deum/M
diabolistický/YCR
dílo/M
disharmonický/YCR
divadlo/MQ
Dobroměřice/C
dobro/MQ
Dobąice/C
dohlásit/ACN
dokvasit/ACN
domlátit/ACN
dopustit/ACN
doskočiątě/M
dostihnout/ACN
dotvrdit/ACN
dovyklidit/ACN
drastický/YCRN
Drysice/C
drľadlo/MQ
dříví/C
dubnium/M
důstojnictvo/MQ
dvojpádlo/MQ
dvořanstvo/C
dľudo/MQ
ekliptický/YCRN
ekvinokcium/M
elastický/YCRN
emko/MQ
energický/YCR
epistemologický/YCRN
esíčko/MQ
esoterický/YCR
eufonický/YCRN
europium/MQ
euroskepticistický/YCR
existencionalistický/YCR
fantasmagorický/YCRN
fermium/MQ
feromagnetický/YCRN
folkloristický/YCR
fortepiano/MQ
frankistický/YCR
funkcionalistický/YCR
gadolinium/MQ
galvanostatický/YCRN
genocentrický/YCR
gesto/MQ
glaukonitický/YCR
gorický/YCRN
Grisonsko/C
Grónsko/MQ
hafnium/MQ
harampádí/C
Havlovice/C
hektický/YCRN
hermafroditický/YCR
Heřmánkovice/C
Hesensko/MQ
historický/YCRN
hlediątě/M
Hluąice/C
hnízdo/MQR
Hodkovice/C
Holeąovice/C
homeopatikum/MQ
hornictvo/C
hostit/ACN
housátko/MQ
housle/C
Hradečno/MQ
hradit/ACN
hrdélko/MQ
hruboskalsko/C
Huątěnovice/C
Hutisko/MQ
hyenistický/YCR
hypersonický/YCR
hyzdit/ACTN
chebsko/MQ
chimérický/YCRN
Choratice/C
Chotilsko/MQ
Chroustovice/C
Chvalovice/C
idylický/YCRN
iksko/MQ
inferno/MQ
intelektualistický/YCR
iridium/MQ
ischiadický/YCRN
Janeiro/MQ
Janovice/C
jelítko/MQ
jezero/MQR
Jičínsko/C
Jivno/MQ
Jutsko/C
kadmium/MQ
kaliko/MQ
kanapíčko/MQ
Karlovarsko/C
kasemata/MQ
kejkle/C
kino/MQR
klepeto/MQ
klikatit/ACN
klubíčko/MQ
kolegium/MQ
Koloděje/C
kolódium/MQ
kombo/MQ
Konopiątě/M
konzumistický/YCR
Kopidlo/MQ
korzo/MQR
kouřmo/MQ
Koľuąice/C
kreacionistický/YCR
krematorium/MQ
kropítko/MQ
Křenice/C
křesílko/MQ
křovíčko/MQ
Kuchařovice/C
kurikulum/MQ
kvasidlo/MQ
kvasnice/C
Labe/M
lawrencium/MQ
lehnický/YCRN
lemovadlo/MQ
letadélko/MQ
lexikum/MQ
leľácký/YCRN
Lidečko/MQ
lidstvo/C
Livonsko/C
lízátko/MQ
Lověąice/C
loľe/M
lyceum/MQ
magický/YCRN
magnézium/MQ
Málkovice/C
Marseille/C
martyrium/MQ
mávátko/MQ
mechanický/YCRN
mejdlíčko/MQ
Měrovice/C
město/MQR
mezipatro/MQ
mezopický/YCRN
milénium/MQ
mimoliturgický/YCR
ministerstvo/MQ
Mlečice/C
mléko/MQR
modulo/MQ
monogenetický/YCR
mořidlo/MQ
Mostecko/C
Mąeno/MQ
mysterium/MQ
mýtit/ACN
nadpřirozeno/MQ
nadtrhnout/ACN
namastit/ACN
Napajadla/MQ
narodit/ACN
natrium/MQ
naturistický/YCR
nedotknutelno/MQ
Nechranice/C
Nepomucenum/MQ
Neprobylice/C
Nezdice/C
nitrogenium/MQ
notorický/YCR
novorozeňátko/MQ
občanstvo/C
obratiątě/M
obrazit/ACXN
odemknout/ACTN
ódium/MQ
odpichovátko/MQ
odrazit/ACXN
Ohařice/C
ohýbadlo/MQ
okysličovadlo/MQ
Oldřichovice/C
opium/MQ
oplodit/ACN
oraniątě/M
orografický/YCRN
osivo/MQR
ostří/C
ovarium/MQ
pacifistický/YCR
paleokoryto/MQ
paradigmatický/YCRN
paraplíčko/MQ
pásmo/MQ
pauperistický/YCR
péčko/MQ
perfektum/MQ
peří/C
peříčko/MQ
pískoviątě/MQ
pizzicato/MQ
Plavno/MQ
plíčko/MQ
plodit/ACN
plutonium/MQ
podhodnotit/ACN
podpole/M
podsadit/ACN
Pohořelice/C
poledne/M
polofaąistický/YCR
pólo/MQ
pomastit/ACN
popraviątě/M
popudit/ACN
posměvacký/YCRN
postskriptum/MQ
potvrdit/ACN
pouzdro/MQR
pradávno/C
prádlo/MQ
právo/MQ
premorfologický/YCR
prezídium/MQ
profylaktikum/MQ
prohodit/ACN
prosit/ACN
prostěradlo/MQ
protisocialistický/YCR
prso/MQ
přadýnko/MQ
Přáslavice/C
předpolitický/YCR
přechodit/ACN
přerazit/ACXN
přesouvadlo/MQ
přeudit/ACN
Příchovice/C
přisladit/ACN
Přítočno/MQ
pseudoadiabatický/YCR
ptáčátko/MQ
pyrrhonistický/YCR
pyľamo/MQ
ráhnoví/C
ráhýnko/MQ
ramínko/MQ
rdousit/ACN
referendum/MQ
rhodium/MQ
rodiątě/M
rondokubistický/YCR
Rovensko/MQ
rozhostit/ACN
rozpočítadlo/MQ
rozrazit/ACXN
rumoviątě/M
Rumunsko/C
rysovadlo/MQ
řemení/C
řeąeto/MQ
sáčko/MQ
samostudium/MQ
scenáristický/YCRN
seaborgium/M
selátko/MQ
sentimentalistický/YCR
servo/MQ
schodiątě/M
sjednotit/ACN
Skalsko/MQ
skóre/M
Slatinice/C
sletiątě/M
slovo/MQR
slůvko/MQ
Smrľice/C
sněrovadlo/MQ
sofistický/YCRN
sousedstvo/MQ
spínátko/MQ
spoluvlastnický/YCRN
srdéčko/MQ
starokaliąnický/YCRN
startoviątě/M
stehno/MQR
storno/MQ
Strakonice/C
Stropnický/YCRN
struhadlo/MQ
střihadlo/MQ
stvořeníčko/MQ
súfistický/YCR
suąidlo/MQ
Svatoňovice/C
symbiotický/YCR
symposium/MQ
syntetický/YCR
ąidítko/MQ
©ilheřovice/C
ąlapátko/MQ
©umice/C
ąvihadlo/MQ
Tatrovice/C
téčko/MQ
tělo/MQR
terárium/MQ
termogalvanický/YCRN
tetraethylolovo/MQ
tiskátko/MQ
tomato/MQR
torický/YCRN
tornádo/MQ
transitivum/MQ
tricium/MQ
trofický/YCR
trsátko/MQ
Třebovice/C
tuzemsko/MQ
Týnią»ko/MQ
typický/YCRN
udidlo/MQ
uhlí/C
ukrotit/ACN
umyvadélko/MQ
upustit/ACN
usazovadlo/MQ
utopistický/YCR
vakuum/MQ
Valaąsko/C
včelstvo/MQ
veledílo/MQ
Velkopavlovicko/C
věno/MQ
veto/MQ
vidle/C
víno/MQR
vlákýnko/MQ
vlichotit/ACN
voličstvo/MQ
Votice/C
vratidlo/MQ
vřetánko/MQ
Vąemyslice/C
vyhladit/ACN
vykuřovadlo/MQ
vymoci/ACN
vyřadit/ACTN
vytisknout/ACTN
vyzvrátit/ACN
vznáąedlo/MQ
Zádveřice/C
zahuą»ovadlo/MQ
zakvasit/ACN
zardousit/ACN
zastaveníčko/MQ
zatáhnout/ACN
zbořeniątě/M
Zdemyslice/C
Zenitcentrum/MQ
zhustit/ACN
zlo/MQ
zmastit/ACN
zpozdit/ACN
zrcadlo/MQR
zvířectvo/MQ
®abčice/C
ľebro/MQ
®eranovice/C
®lutice/C
ľrádlo/MQ
